Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-603
Rules; not retroactive.

The Nebraska Rules of the Road as enacted by Laws 1993, LB 370, shall not have a retroactive effect and shall not apply to any traffic accident, to any cause of action arising out of a traffic accident or judgment arising therefrom, or to any violation of the motor vehicle laws of this state occurring prior to January 1, 1994. All violations, offenses, prosecutions, and criminal appeals under prior law are saved and preserved. All civil causes of action based upon or under prior law arising out of traffic accidents prior to such date and judgments thereon or appeals therefrom are saved and preserved.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 120;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,120;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 99.